Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-239
Issued and outstanding shares.

(MBCA 6.03) (a) A corporation
may issue the number of shares of each class or series authorized by the articles
of incorporation. Shares that are issued are outstanding shares until they
are reacquired, redeemed, converted, or canceled.

(b) The reacquisition, redemption,
or conversion of outstanding shares is subject to the limitations of subsection
(c) of this section and to section 21-252.

(c) At all times that shares of the corporation are
outstanding, one or more shares that together have unlimited voting rights
and one or more shares that together are entitled to receive the net assets
of the corporation upon dissolution must be outstanding.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 39.
January 1, 2017